Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3895
(UTC 1006) Reliance on trust instrument.

(UTC 1006) A trustee who acts in reasonable reliance on the terms of the trust as expressed in the trust instrument is not liable to a beneficiary for a breach of trust to the extent the breach resulted from the reliance.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 95.